Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,295
Defendant; defenses not available.

It is
not a defense to a cause of action brought pursuant to the Exploited Children's
Civil Remedy Act that the defendant:

(1)
Did not know the participant or portrayed observer appearing in the visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct;

(2) Did not appear in the visual depiction
of sexually explicit conduct containing the participant or portrayed observer;
or

(3) Did not commit, assist with the commission of, or personally
observe the commission of acts of sexually explicit conduct portrayed in the
visual depiction containing the participant or portrayed observer.

Laws 2010, LB728, § 6.